Tennessee, session 114, HB0097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-33-101, is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Working day" means the number of hours an employee is scheduled to work
in a 24-hour period.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0097
001107
- 1 -